Washington statutes.
RCW 9.31.090

Escaped prisoner recaptured.

Every person in custody, under sentence of imprisonment for any crime, who shall escape from custody, may be recaptured and imprisoned for a term equal to the unexpired portion of the original term.

[ 1909 c 249 s 89; RRS s 2341.]

NOTES:

Indeterminate sentences: Chapter 9.95 RCW.